District of Columbia statutes.
38-2313

Repealed

Grant of certain lands — Transfer.

Repealed.

Sept. 13, 1960, 74 Stat. 916, Pub. L. 86-776, § 1
Aug. 4, 1986, 100 Stat. 1790, Pub. L. 99-371, § 410
1981 Ed., § 31-1813.
1973 Ed., § 31-1033.